Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.500

Termination of membership.

Membership in the retirement system is terminated when a member retires for service or disability, dies, or withdraws his or her accumulated contributions.

The prior service certificate becomes void when a member dies or withdraws the accumulated contributions, and any prior administrative interpretation of the board of trustees, consistent with this section, is hereby ratified, affirmed and approved.

[ 1995 c 134 s 13. Prior: 1994 c 197 s 17; 1994 c 177 s 5; 1991 c 35 s 57; 1986 c 317 s 2; 1983 c 233 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 193 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 16; 1967 c 50 s 6; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 5; 1955 c 274 s 23; 1947 c 80 s 50; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-69.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Findings—1994 c 177: See note following RCW 41.50.125.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Legislative findings—Intent—Severability—1986 c 317: See notes following RCW 41.40.150.

Severability—1983 c 233: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 c 233 s 4.]

Emergency—Severability—1974 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 41.32.310.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 50: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Effective date—Severability—1965 ex.s. c 81: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.